dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- झापा; झापा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झापा__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रामचन्द्र; रामचन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रामचन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नारायण; नारायण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नारायण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राधा; राधा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राधा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शास्त्री; शास्त्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शास्त्री__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरस्वती; सरस्वती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरस्वती__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जङ्गबहादुर; जङ्गबहादुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जङ्गबहादुर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राजीव; राजीव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राजीव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्मला; निर्मला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्मला__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जनकपुर; जनकपुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जनकपुर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चितवन; चितवन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चितवन__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पोखरा; पोखरा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पोखरा__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ﻿नेपाल; ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="/﻿नेपाल__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नेपाल</l>
          <r>﻿नेपाल<s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लामा; लामा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लामा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेन; सेन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सेन__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज्ञानु; ज्ञानु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज्ञानु__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गिरिजाप्रसाद; गिरिजाप्रसाद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गिरिजाप्रसाद__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देवकोटा; देवकोटा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देवकोटा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अविनव; अविनव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अविनव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खाडी; खाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खाडी__np_m_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एशिया; एशिया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एशिया__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गणेशमान; गणेशमान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गणेशमान__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शाह; शाह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शाह__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दार्जीलिङ; दार्जीलिङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दार्जीलिङ__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिद्धार्थ; सिद्धार्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिद्धार्थ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दयावीर; दयावीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दयावीर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भानुभक्त; भानुभक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भानुभक्त__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चन्द्र; चन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इलाम; इलाम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इलाम__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गिरिजा; गिरिजा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गिरिजा__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दार्जीलिङ्ग; दार्जीलिङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दार्जीलिङ्ग__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिव्या; दिव्या; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिव्या__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिवारी; तिवारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिवारी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साधु; साधु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साधु__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुद्ध; बुद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बुद्ध__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घिमिरे; घिमिरे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घिमिरे__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाल्पा; पाल्पा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाल्पा__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="झापा"><i>झापा</i><par n="झापा__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="रामचन्द्र"><i>रामचन्द्र</i><par n="रामचन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नारायण"><i>नारायण</i><par n="नारायण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="राधा"><i>राधा</i><par n="राधा__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शास्त्री"><i>शास्त्री</i><par n="शास्त्री__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सरस्वती"><i>सरस्वती</i><par n="सरस्वती__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जङ्गबहादुर"><i>जङ्गबहादुर</i><par n="जङ्गबहादुर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="राजीव"><i>राजीव</i><par n="राजीव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्मला"><i>निर्मला</i><par n="निर्मला__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जनकपुर"><i>जनकपुर</i><par n="जनकपुर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="चितवन"><i>चितवन</i><par n="चितवन__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="पोखरा"><i>पोखरा</i><par n="पोखरा__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="﻿नेपाल"><i></i><par n="/﻿नेपाल__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="लामा"><i>लामा</i><par n="लामा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सेन"><i>सेन</i><par n="सेन__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्ञानु"><i>ज्ञानु</i><par n="ज्ञानु__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गिरिजाप्रसाद"><i>गिरिजाप्रसाद</i><par n="गिरिजाप्रसाद__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="देवकोटा"><i>देवकोटा</i><par n="देवकोटा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अविनव"><i>अविनव</i><par n="अविनव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="खाडी"><i>खाडी</i><par n="खाडी__np_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="एशिया"><i>एशिया</i><par n="एशिया__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="गणेशमान"><i>गणेशमान</i><par n="गणेशमान__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शाह"><i>शाह</i><par n="शाह__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दार्जीलिङ"><i>दार्जीलिङ</i><par n="दार्जीलिङ__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सिद्धार्थ"><i>सिद्धार्थ</i><par n="सिद्धार्थ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दयावीर"><i>दयावीर</i><par n="दयावीर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भानुभक्त"><i>भानुभक्त</i><par n="भानुभक्त__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="चन्द्र"><i>चन्द्र</i><par n="चन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="इलाम"><i>इलाम</i><par n="इलाम__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="गिरिजा"><i>गिरिजा</i><par n="गिरिजा__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दार्जीलिङ्ग"><i>दार्जीलिङ्ग</i><par n="दार्जीलिङ्ग__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="दिव्या"><i>दिव्या</i><par n="दिव्या__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="तिवारी"><i>तिवारी</i><par n="तिवारी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="साधु"><i>साधु</i><par n="साधु__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बुद्ध"><i>बुद्ध</i><par n="बुद्ध__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="घिमिरे"><i>घिमिरे</i><par n="घिमिरे__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पाल्पा"><i>पाल्पा</i><par n="पाल्पा__np_nt_an"/></e>
